Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2388.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; Arizona commerce authority; study; report A. The sum of $100,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Arizona commerce authority to conduct a study of the economic benefits of small modular reactors and data centers to this state and local governments. The study must include: 1. The number of jobs created by the construction and operation of small modular reactors and by the construction and operation of data centers and the average annual salaries of those jobs. 2. The amount of any state and local tax revenue produced by the construction and operation of small modular reactors and by the construction and operation of data centers. 3. How small modular reactors and data centers could support increased local broadband and infrastructure investments and improvements. 4. The number and type of secondary and tertiary businesses that may relocate to areas anchored by a small modular reactor or data center and the number of jobs that those businesses could create and the average annual salaries of those jobs. 5. Any other economic benefits the Arizona commerce authority deems relevant. B. On or before June 30, 2027, the Arizona commerce authority shall submit a report of its finding from the study conducted pursuant to subsection A of this section to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the chairperson of the commerce committee of the house of representatives and the chairperson of the regulatory affairs and government efficiency committee of the senate and shall make available a copy of this report on the authority's website.